test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kana45_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kana: # Noun (45) kana 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
    kana+N+Pl+Abe: kanoldaq
#    kana+N+Pl+Abe: [kanoldaq, kannoldaq]
    kana+N+Pl+Abl: kanolt
#    kana+N+Pl+Abl: [kanolt, kannolt]
    kana+N+Pl+Ade: kanol
#    kana+N+Pl+Ade: [kanol, kannol]
    kana+N+Pl+All: kanolõ
#    kana+N+Pl+All: [kanolõ, kannolõ]
    kana+N+Pl+Com: kannogaq
    kana+N+Pl+Ela: kanost
#    kana+N+Pl+Ela: [kanost, kannost]
    kana+N+Pl+Gen: kanno
    kana+N+Pl+Ill: kannohe
#    kana+N+Pl+Ill: [kannohe, kanno, kannodõ]
    kana+N+Pl+Ine: kanon
#    kana+N+Pl+Ine: [kanon, kanoh, kanohn, kannon, kannoh, kannohn]
    kana+N+Pl+Nom: kanaq
    kana+N+Pl+Par: kanno
    kana+N+Pl+Ter: kanoniq
#    kana+N+Pl+Ter: [kanoniq, kannoniq]
    kana+N+Pl+Tra: kanos
#    kana+N+Pl+Tra: [kanos, kannos]
    kana+N+Sg+Abe: kanaldaq
    kana+N+Sg+Abl: kanalt
    kana+N+Sg+Ade: kanal
    kana+N+Sg+All: kanalõ
    kana+N+Sg+Com: kanagaq
    kana+N+Sg+Ela: kanast
    kana+N+Sg+Gen: kana
    kana+N+Sg+Ill: kanna
    kana+N+Sg+Ine: kanan
#    kana+N+Sg+Ine: [kanan, kanah, kanahn]
    kana+N+Sg+Nom: kana
    kana+N+Sg+Par: kanna
    kana+N+Sg+Tra: kanas
    kana+N+Sg+Ter: kananiq
